wichi-textbook.lexc
!!!wichi.lexc!!!

!!!Based on a textbook of Wichí at http://lenguawichi.com.ar/wp-content/uploads/2017/01/manual-gramatica-wichi-vol-1.original.pdf

!!!TODO: classifiers (animals an objects), tense, number, gender on nouns

Multichar_Symbols %<V%> %<1SUB.Sg%> %<1SUB.Pl.Incl%> %<1SUB.Pl.Excl%>
                        %<2SUB%>    %<2SUB.Sg%>
                        %<3SUB%>    %<3SUB.Sg%>
                        %<1OBJ%>    %<1OBJ.Sg%>      %<1OBJ.Pl%>
                        %<2OBJ%>    %<2OBJ.Sg%>      %<2OBJ.Pl%>
                        %<3OBJ%>    %<3OBJ.Sg%>      %<3OBJ.Pl%>
                  %<N%> %<PosCLSF%> %<UNK%>
                  lh fw MH NH YH WH PH TH KH CH%" ch

LEXICON Root

Noun    ;
Subject ;

LEXICON Noun

asinoj                              NounInf;
!!! dependent/inalienable
!!! independent/alienable

LEXICON NounInf

%<N%>:0                             #;

LEXICON Subject

%<1SUB.Sg%>:n'^                     Verb;
%<1SUB.Pl.Incl%>:to^                Verb;
%<1SUB.Pl.Incl%>:ta^                Verb;
%<2SUB%>:la^                        Verb;
%<3SUB%>:0                          Verb;

LEXICON Verb

chefwen                             VerbInf;
nom                                 VerbInf;
mo                                  VerbInf;
w'en                                VerbInf;
yahin                               VerbInf;
t'ischey                            VerbInf;
choj                                VerbInf;
tefw                                VerbInf;
kw'es                               VerbInf;
w'elh                               VerbInf;
lej                                 VerbInf;
fwet                                VerbInf;
pak                                 VerbInf;
yik                                 VerbInf;
tsek                                VerbInf;
chim                                VerbInf;
w'atshan                            VerbInf;
naloy                               VerbInf;
yotaj                               VerbInf;
amo                                 VerbInf;

LEXICON VerbInf

%<V%>:0                             Object;

LEXICON Object

%<1OBJ.Sg%>:^n'u                    Quant;
%<1OBJ.Pl%>:^nam                    Quant;
%<2OBJ%>:^'am                       Quant;
%<3OBJ%>:0                          Quant;

LEXICON Quant

%<Sg%>:0                            #;
%<Pl%>:^hen                         #;
